Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.698

Regulation of financial transactions—Limitations.

A city, town, or governmental entity subject to this title may not regulate the terms, conditions, or disclosures of any lawful financial transaction between a consumer and (1) a business or professional under the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, or (2) any financial institution as defined under *RCW 30.22.041.

[ 2005 c 338 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.22.041 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.041 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Finding—Intent—2005 c 338: "The legislature finds that consumers, financial services providers, and financial institutions need uniformity and certainty in their financial transactions. It is the intent of the legislature to reserve the authority to regulate customer financial transactions involving consumers, financial services providers, and financial institutions." [ 2005 c 338 s 1.]